Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1318

Reference to external facts.

A plan may refer to facts ascertainable outside the plan if the manner in which the facts will operate upon the plan is specified in the plan. The facts may include the occurrence of an event or a determination or action by a person, whether or not the event, determination, or action is within the control of a party to the conversion or merger.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1318.]